Massachusetts, session 194th, H1303.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General laws is hereby amended by inserting the following Section
113A:
When an action to recover damages has been settled, any insurer which has agreed to pay
all or part of the settlement on behalf of a settling defendant, shall pay the amount due to any
settling plaintiff within twenty-one days of tender by the settling plaintiff to the settling
defendant of a duly executed release executed.
of 1